Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 3
IDENTIFICATION CARDS

42-2-301. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Department" means the department of revenue.

"Identification card" means the identification card issued under this article.

"Registrant" means a person who acquires an identification card under the provisions of this part 3.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2160, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-401 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-2-302. Department may or shall issue - limitations - rules.

A person who is a resident of Colorado may be issued an identification card by the department, attested by the applicant and department as to true name, date of birth, current address, and other identifying data the department may require.
(1) (a) (I) A person who is a resident of Colorado may be issued an identification card by the department, attested by the applicant and department as to true name, date of birth, current address, and other identifying data the department may require.

An application for an identification card shall contain the applicant's fingerprint.

An application for an identification card shall include the applicant's social security number or a sworn statement made under penalty of law that the applicant does not have a social security number.

An identification card shall not be issued until any previously issued instruction permit or minor driver's or driver's license is surrendered or cancelled.

The applicant's social security number shall remain confidential and shall not be placed on the applicant's identification card. Such confidentiality shall not extend to the state child support enforcement agency, the department, or a court of competent jurisdiction when requesting information in the course of activities authorized under article 13 of title 26, C.R.S., or article 14 of title 14, C.R.S.

Every application shall include the opportunity for the applicant to self-identify his or her race or ethnicity. The race or ethnicity information that may be identified on the application shall not be printed on the identification card but shall be maintained in the stored information as defined by section 42-2-303 (1)(b)(II). That information must be accessible to a law enforcement officer through magnetic or electronic readers.

In addition to the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), an application for an identification card shall state that:

The applicant understands that, as a resident of the state of Colorado, any motor vehicle owned by the applicant must be registered in Colorado pursuant to the laws of the state and the applicant may be subject to criminal penalties, civil penalties, cancellation or denial of the applicant's identification card, and liability for any unpaid registration fees and specific ownership taxes if the applicant fails to comply with such registration requirements; and

The applicant agrees, within thirty days after the date the applicant became a resident, to register in Colorado any vehicle owned by the applicant.

The applicant shall verify the statements required by this paragraph (b) by the applicant's signature on the application.

A sworn statement that is made under penalty of perjury shall be sufficient evidence of the applicant's social security number required by this subsection (1) and shall authorize the department to issue an identification card to the applicant. Nothing in this paragraph (c) shall be construed to prevent the department from cancelling, denying, recalling, or updating an identification card if the department learns that the applicant has provided a false social security number.

The department shall issue an identification card only upon the furnishing of a birth certificate or other documentary evidence of identity that the department may require. An applicant who submits a birth certificate or other documentary evidence issued by an entity other than a state or the United States shall also submit such proof as the department may require that the applicant is lawfully present in the United States. An applicant who submits as proof of identity a driver's license or identification card issued by a state that issues drivers' licenses or identification cards to persons who are not lawfully present in the United States shall also submit such proof as the department may require that the applicant is lawfully present in the United States. The department may assess a fee under section 42-2-306 (1)(b) if the department is required to undertake additional efforts to verify the identity of the applicant.

The department may not issue an identification card to any person who is not lawfully present in the United States.

The department may not issue an identification card to any person who is not a resident of the state of Colorado. The department shall issue an identification card only upon the furnishing of such evidence of residency that the department may require.

(2.5) (a) The department shall issue a new identification card to a person who has a gender different from the sex denoted on that person's identification card when the department receives a new birth certificate issued pursuant to section 25-2-113.8 or when the department receives:

A statement, in a form or format designated by the department, from the person, or from the person's parent if the person is a minor, or from the person's guardian or legal representative, signed under penalty of law, confirming the sex designation on the person's identification card does not align with the person's gender identity; and

If the person is a minor under the age of eighteen, a statement, in a form or format designated by the department, signed under penalty of law, from a professional medical or mental health care provider licensed in good standing in Colorado or with an equivalent license in good standing from another jurisdiction, stating that the sex designation on the birth certificate does not align with the minor's gender identity. This subsection (2.5)(a)(II) does not require a minor to undergo any specific surgery, treatment, clinical care, or behavioral health care.

The department may only amend a sex designation for an individual's identification card one time upon the individual's request. Any further requests from the individual for additional sex designation changes require the submission of a court order indicating that the sex designation change is required.

The department has the authority to cancel, deny, or deny the reissuance of the identification card of a person upon determining that the person is not entitled to issuance of the identification card for the following reasons:

Failure to give the required or correct information in an application or commission of any fraud in making such application;

Permission of an unlawful or fraudulent use or conviction of misuse of an identification card;

The person is not lawfully present in the United States; or

The person is not a resident of the state of Colorado.

If the department cancels, denies, or denies the reissuance of the identification card of a person, such person may request a hearing pursuant to section 24-4-105, C.R.S.

Any male United States citizen or immigrant who applies for an identification card or a renewal or duplicate of any such card and who is at least eighteen years of age but less than twenty-six years of age shall be registered in compliance with the requirements of section 3 of the "Military Selective Service Act", 50 U.S.C. App. sec. 453, as amended.

The department shall forward in an electronic format the necessary personal information of the applicants identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) to the selective service system. The applicant's submission of an application shall serve as an indication that the applicant either has already registered with the selective service system or that he is authorizing the department to forward to the selective service system the necessary information for such registration. The department shall notify the applicant that his submission of an application constitutes consent to registration with the selective service system, if so required by federal law.

The department shall not issue an identification card to a first time applicant in Colorado until the department completes its verification of all facts relative to such applicant's right to receive an identification card including the residency, identity, age, and current licensing status of the applicant. Such verification shall utilize appropriate and accurate technology and techniques. Such verification shall include a comparison of existing driver's license and identification card images in department files with the applicant's images to ensure such applicant has only one identity.

The department shall not issue an identification card to a person who holds a valid minor driver's or driver's license.

The department shall not issue an identification card to an individual whose authorization to be present in the United States is temporary unless the individual applies under and complies with part 5 of this article.

The department shall promulgate rules establishing procedures for resolving minor spelling inconsistencies and accepting alternative documents to birth certificates to establish lawful presence.

In accordance with rules promulgated by the department and upon the applicant's submission, either electronically or by mail, of an application and payment of the required fee, the department may issue an identification card to the holder of a driver's license issued under section 42-2-114 or renewed under 42-2-118 if the applicant holds a valid license or if no more than one year has passed since the expiration of the applicant's driver's license.

Once the department issues an identification card under this subsection (9), the department shall cancel any valid driver's license held by the applicant.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2161, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(2) amended and (3) added, p. 202, § 1, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1001, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 98:

(2) and (3)(a) amended, p. 295, §§ 3, 4, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(a) amended and (5) and (6) added, p. 941, § 6, effective July 1; (1)(a) amended and (1)(c) added, p. 783, § 2, effective August 8; (4) added, p. 647, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2002:

(2)(a) amended, p. 171, § 2, effective April 2.

L. 2005:

(1)(a) amended, p. 649, § 19, effective May 27.

L. 2006:

(1)(a) amended, p. 46, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(7) added, (SB 13-251), ch. 402, p. 2352, § 3, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(8) added, (SB 14-087), ch. 306, p. 1298, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2016:

(1)(a)(VI) added, (HB 16-1021), ch. 322, p. 1308, § 3, effective June 10; (9) added, (HB 16-1269), ch. 78, p. 202, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2019:

(2.5) added, (HB 19-1039), ch. 377, p. 3406, § 4, effective January 1, 2020.

L. 2020:

(2.5)(a) amended, (SB 20-166), ch. 280, p. 1371, § 3, effective July 13.

42-2-303. Contents of identification card.

The identification card shall be the same size as a driver's license issued pursuant to parts 1 and 2 of this article. The card shall adequately describe the registrant, bear the registrant's picture, and bear the following: "State of Colorado", "Identification Card No. ....", and "This is not a driver's license." Each identification card issued to an individual under this section shall show a photograph of the registrant's full face.

In the event the department issues an identification card that contains stored information, such card may include only the information that is specifically referenced in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), and that appears in printed form on the face of the card issued by the department to the registrant and any race or ethnicity information identified on an application pursuant to section 42-2-302 (1)(a)(VI); except that such stored information shall not include the registrant's social security number.

As used in this paragraph (b), "stored information" includes information that is stored on the identification card by means of magnetic or electronic encoding, or by any other technology designed to store retrievable information.

Repealed.

An identification card shall contain one or more security features that are not visible and are capable of authenticating such card and any information contained therein.

At the applicant's voluntary request, the department shall issue an identification card bearing an identifier of a branch of the United States armed forces, such as "Marine Corps", "Navy", "Army", "Air Force", or "Coast Guard", if the applicant possesses a currently valid military identification document, a DD214 form issued by the United States government, or any other document accepted by the department that demonstrates that the applicant is an active member or a veteran of the branch of service that the applicant has requested be placed on the identification card. The applicant shall not be required to provide documentation that the applicant is an active member or a veteran of a branch of the United States armed forces to renew or be reissued an identification card bearing an identifier issued pursuant to this subsection (4). The department shall not place more than one branch of the United States armed forces identifier on an applicant's identification card.

Repealed.

Upon the applicant presenting a DD214 form issued by the United States government or any other document accepted by the department that demonstrates that the applicant is a veteran of the United States armed forces, the department shall print the word "Veteran" on the identification card.

The holder of an identification card bearing the word "Veteran" need not present documentation that the holder is a veteran of the United States armed forces to renew or reissue the identification card.

The department shall not issue an identification card bearing the word "Veteran" if the applicant's documentation shows that the applicant received a dishonorable discharge.

Source:

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1453, § 2, effective May 25; entire title amended with relocations, p. 2161, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2001:

(3) added, p. 941, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2) repealed, p. 650, § 20, effective May 27.

L. 2010:

(4) added, (HB 10-1209), ch. 322, p. 1498, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(4)(b) repealed, (HB 13-1011), ch. 90, p. 291, § 2, effective August 7; (5) added, (HB 13-1119), ch. 177, p. 653, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2016:

(1)(b)(I) amended, (HB 16-1021), ch. 322, p. 1308, § 4, effective June 10.

42-2-304. Validity of identification card - rules.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an identification card issued pursuant to this part 3 expires on the birthday of the registrant in the fifth year after issuance of the identification card. The department may purge its records of such cards twelve years after issuance; except that any records concerning identification cards issued prior to April 16, 1996, may not be purged until October 1, 2003.

(1.5) (a) Any individual who has been issued an identification card pursuant to this section may renew the card prior to the expiration of the card upon application in person and payment of the required fee.

The department shall not renew an identification card for a person if the person would not be eligible for an identification card pursuant to section 42-2-302 (2)(b) or (2)(c) or 42-2-505.

(1.7) (a) If allowed under federal law, the department shall allow renewal of an identification card issued under section 42-2-302 or 42-2-505 by mail subject to the following requirements:

Renewal by mail shall be available to qualifying individuals as determined by the department of revenue including but not limited to persons with disabilities and individuals who are sixty-five years of age or older.

Renewal by mail is only available every other renewal period; except that renewal by mail is available every renewal period if the applicant is sixty-five years of age or older.

A person renewing by mail shall attest under penalty of perjury that he or she is lawfully present in the United States.

A person renewing by mail shall attest under penalty of perjury that he or she is a resident of the state of Colorado.

Every applicant for renewal of an identification card by mail shall submit the required fee or surcharge, if any.

The department may promulgate rules necessary for the implementation of this subsection (1.7).

(1.8) (a) The department shall allow an applicant to renew an identification card issued under section 42-2-302 or 42-2-505 by electronic means if the applicant:

Is sixty-five years of age or older;

Attests under penalty of perjury to being lawfully present in the United States;

Attests under penalty of perjury to being a resident of Colorado; and

Pays any required fee or surcharge.

Applicants who meet the qualifications of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.8) may electronically renew every renewal period.

(1.9) (a) The department may allow an applicant to renew an identification card issued under section 42-2-302 or 42-2-505 by electronic means if the applicant:

Is twenty-one years of age or older, but not older than sixty-four years of age;

Attests under penalty of perjury to being lawfully present in the United States;

Attests under penalty of perjury to being a resident of Colorado; and

Pays any required fee or surcharge.

Applicants who meet the qualifications of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.9) may electronically renew only for two consecutive renewal periods.

An identification card issued on or before June 30, 2001, to a person less than eighteen years of age shall expire on the registrant's eighteenth birthday. Such person may renew the card prior to its expiration upon application in person and by paying the required fee. The renewed card for such person shall expire on the registrant's twenty-first birthday.

An identification card issued to an individual prior to April 16, 1996, does not expire unless the true name or social security number, if any, of the individual changes. An individual who has been issued a card prior to April 16, 1996, may voluntarily surrender such card to the department and, upon payment of the fee required for an identification card application, may request issuance of a new identification card containing an expiration date pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

An identification card issued on or after July 1, 2001, to a person less than twenty-one years of age shall expire on the registrant's twenty-first birthday.

An identification card issued to an individual sixty-five years of age or older expires on the birthday of the registrant in the fifth year after issuance of the identification card.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2161, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 332, § 1, effective April 16.

L. 98:

(1.5) amended, p. 296, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1) and (2)(a) amended and (2)(b.5) added, p. 1346, § 8, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 650, § 21, effective May 27.

L. 2006:

(1.7) and (2)(c) added, pp. 570, 571, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1.7)(a)(II) amended and (1.8) added, (SB 13-004), ch. 234, p. 1129, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(1.9) added, (SB 14-194), ch. 346, p. 1548, § 14, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

(1.5)(b), IP(1.7)(a), IP(1.8)(a), and IP(1.9)(a) amended, (SB 18-108), ch. 260, p. 1598, § 6, effective January 1, 2019.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-404 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-2-304.5. Cancellation or denial of identification card - failure to register vehicles in Colorado.

The department may cancel, deny, or deny reissuance of an identification card upon determining that the registrant has failed to register in Colorado all vehicles owned by the registrant under the requirements of section 42-3-103. Upon such cancellation, the registrant shall surrender the identification card to the department. The registrant is entitled to a hearing under the procedures provided in section 42-2-122.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1002, § 4, effective August 6.

42-2-305. Lost, stolen, or destroyed cards.

If an identification card is lost, destroyed, or mutilated or a new name is acquired, the registrant may obtain a new identification card upon furnishing satisfactory proof of such fact to the department. Any registrant who loses an identification card and who, after obtaining a new identification card, finds the original card shall immediately surrender the original card to the department. The same documentary evidence shall be furnished for a new identification card as for an original identification card. A new identification card issued pursuant to this section shall expire on the birthday of the registrant in the fifth year after the issuance of the new identification card; except that, if the registrant is under the age of twenty-one years at the time the application for the new identification card is made, the new identification card shall expire on the registrant's twenty-first birthday, or if issued under part 5 of this article 2, the identification card expires as provided in section 42-2-509 (1) or on the twenty-first birthday of the applicant as set by rule of the department.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2162, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1347, § 10, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1918, § 144, effective August 5.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-108), ch. 260, p. 1598, § 7, effective January 1, 2019.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-405 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-2-306. Fees - disposition.

The department shall charge and collect the following fees:

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2007, p. 1572

, § 5, effective July 1, 2007.)

Except as provided in subparagraph (III.5) of this paragraph (a), a fee as determined by the department under section

42-2-114.5

for an identification card or renewal of an identification card.

Repealed.

(III.5) The department shall not charge a fee to an applicant who is:

Sixty years of age or older;

Referred by a county department of human or social services pursuant to section

25.5-4-205 (3)

, 26-2-106 (3), or 26-5-101 (3)(o); or

Referred by the department of corrections, the division of youth services, or a county jail.

and (V) Repealed.

A fee as determined by the department under section

42-2-114.5

to cover the costs incurred for the reissuance of an identification card that has been cancelled or denied under section

42-2-302 (3)

, or to verify the identity of the applicant.

Fees collected under this section shall be remitted monthly to the state treasurer, who shall deposit the fee in the licensing services cash fund created in section 42-2-114.5.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2162, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 333, § 2, effective April 16.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 203, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1)(a) amended, p. 934, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1347, § 9, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2001:

(1)(a)(IV) amended and (1)(a)(V) added, p. 940, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(a)(V)(B) amended, p. 657, § 3, effective April 24; (1)(a)(I) and (1)(a)(II) amended, p. 2023, § 119, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(a)(I), (1)(a)(II), and (2) amended, p. 1572, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (SB 09-274), ch. 210, p. 953, § 6, effective May 1; (1)(a)(V) amended, (SB 09-025), ch. 266, p. 1215, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(a)(II) amended and (1)(a)(III.5) added, (SB 10-006), ch. 341, p. 1578, § 4, effective June 5; (1)(a)(V)(A) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2125, § 184, effective August 11.

L. 2014:

(1)(a)(II) and (1)(b) amended and (1)(a)(III), (1)(a)(IV), and (1)(a)(V) repealed, (SB 14-194), ch. 346, p. 1548, § 15, effective June 5.

L. 2015:

(1)(a)(II) amended, (SB 15-264), ch. 259, p. 969, § 94, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(1)(a)(III.5)(C) amended, (HB 17-1329), ch. 381, p. 1986, § 69, effective June 6.

L. 2018:

(1)(a)(III.5)(B) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 454, § 143, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-406 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

42-2-307. Change of address.

Any registrant who acquires an address different from the address shown on the identification card issued to the registrant shall, within thirty days thereafter, notify the department of such change as specified in section 42-2-119 (1)(a). The department may thereupon take any action deemed necessary to ensure that the identification card reflects the proper address of the registrant.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2162, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 650, § 22, effective May 27.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1045), ch. 317, p. 1479, § 4, effective July 1, 2011.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-407 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-2-308. No liability on public entity.

No public entity shall be liable for any loss or injury directly or indirectly resulting from false or inaccurate information contained in identification cards provided for in this part 3.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2162, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-408 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-2-309. Unlawful acts.

It is unlawful for any person:

To display, cause or permit to be displayed, or have in that person's possession any surrendered, fictitious, fraudulently altered, or fraudulently obtained identification card;

To lend that person's identification card to any other person or knowingly permit the use thereof by another;

To display or represent any identification card not issued to that person as being that person's card;

To permit any unlawful use of an identification card issued to that person;

To do any act forbidden or fail to perform any act required by this part 3, which would not include use of such card after the expiration date;

To photograph, photostat, duplicate, or in any way reproduce any identification card or facsimile thereof in such a manner that it could be mistaken for a valid license, or to display or have in that person's possession any such photograph, photostat, duplicate, reproduction, or facsimile unless authorized by law;

To photograph, photostat, duplicate, or in any way produce any identification card as defined in section 42-2-301 (2), or facsimile thereof, unless authorized by law, in such a manner that it could be mistaken for a valid identification card or to display or possess any such photograph, photostat, duplicate, production, or facsimile;

To photograph, photostat, duplicate, or in any way reproduce any identification card or facsimile thereof for the purpose of distribution, resale, reuse, or manipulation of the data or images contained in such identification card unless authorized by the department or otherwise authorized by law.

Source:

L. 94:

(1)(g) added, p. 495, § 1, effective March 31; entire title amended with relocations, p. 2162, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(1)(h) added, p. 355, § 3, effective August 6.

42-2-310. Violation.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this part 3 commits a class 3 misdemeanor, as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2163, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1560, § 365, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-410 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

42-2-311. County jail identification processing unit - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-006), ch. 403, p. 2217, § 2, effective June 2.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3)(b) provided that this section would be repealed if the revisor of statutes did not receive notification from the executive director of the department of revenue that the estimated amount of moneys to implement this section was received. The revisor of statutes did not receive such notice by June 30, 2012, and so this section was repealed, effective July 1, 2012. (See

L. 2009, p. 2217

.)

42-2-312. County jail identification processing unit fund. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-006), ch. 403, p. 2217, § 2, effective June 2.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1708, § 135, effective August 7.

42-2-313. Department consult with counties on county jail identification processing unit.

The department shall meet with representatives of Adams, Arapahoe, Boulder, Douglas, and Jefferson counties, the city and county of Denver, and the city and county of Broomfield on a regular basis to discuss future implementation of a county jail identification processing unit that would travel to county jails to process identification cards for prisoners, as well as to discuss intergovernmental agreements for cost-sharing solutions to fund the unit, solutions to technical and equipment issues that the department has identified, and implementation of program timelines.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-006), ch. 403, p. 2217, § 2, effective June 2.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2009 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 403, Session Laws of Colorado 2009.